Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202481-3806
Commission; meetings; quorum; attendance required; exception.

(1) The commission shall meet at least once every calendar quarter. Meetings shall be held in January, April, July, and October. Special meetings may be called at the request of eight voting members. Eight voting members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(2) The office of any member of the commission who, without a valid excuse, fails to attend quarterly or special meetings shall be vacant.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 33.
July 19, 2024